Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 3. Town Highways
§ 309b.
Local match; certain town highway programs.

Notwithstanding subsection 309a(a) of this title, grants provided to towns under the Town Highway Structures Program shall be matched by local funds sufficient to cover 20 percent of the project costs, unless the town has adopted road and bridge standards, has completed a network inventory, and has submitted an annual certification of compliance for town road and bridge standards to the Secretary, in which event the local match shall be sufficient to cover 10 percent of the project costs. The Secretary may adopt rules to implement the Town Highway Structures Program. Town highway structures projects receiving funds pursuant to this subsection shall be the responsibility of the applicant municipality.

Notwithstanding subsection 309a(a) of this title, grants provided to towns under the Class 2 Town Highway Roadway Program shall be matched by local funds sufficient to cover 30 percent of the project costs, unless the town has adopted road and bridge standards, has completed a network inventory, and has submitted an annual certification of compliance for town road and bridge standards to the Secretary, in which event the local match shall be sufficient to cover 20 percent of the project costs. The Secretary may adopt rules to implement the Class 2 Town Highway Roadway Program. Class 2 town highway roadway projects receiving funds pursuant to this subsection shall be the responsibility of the applicant municipality, and a municipality shall not receive a grant in excess of $200,000.00.

Notwithstanding subsections 309a(a), (b), and (c) of this title, a municipality may use a grant awarded under the Town Highway Structures Program or the Class 2 Town Highway Roadway Program to provide the nonfederal matching funds required to draw down a federal earmark or to match grants provided to towns under the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA). In all such cases, the grant shall be matched by local funds as provided in this section. The intended use of a town highway grant as matching funds for a federal earmark or for grants provided to towns under the ARRA shall not entitle a municipal grant applicant to any priority for a grant award in any fiscal year. When grants awarded under the Town Highway Structures Program or the Class 2 Town Highway Roadway Program are used to satisfy nonfederal matching requirements for federal earmarks or for grants provided to towns under the ARRA, the term “project costs” in subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall refer only to the nonfederal match for the federal earmark or for a grant provided to towns under the ARRA.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 15, 1992; amended

1993, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 17, 1994;

1997, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 27, 1998;

2001, No. 64

, § 15, eff. June 16, 2001;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 56, 57;

2007, No. 75

, § 20;

2009, No. 50

, § 33;

2009, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. July 1, 2011;

2021, No. 55

, § 16.

§ 309c.
Cancellation of locally managed projects.

Notwithstanding section 309a of this title, a municipality or other local sponsor responsible for a locally managed project through a grant agreement with the Agency shall be responsible for the repayment, in whole or in part, of federal funds required by the Federal Highway Administration or other federal agency because of cancellation of the project by the municipality or other local sponsor due to circumstances or events wholly or partly within the municipality’s or other local sponsor’s control. Prior to any such determination that cancellation of a project was due to circumstances or events wholly or partly within a municipality’s or other local sponsor’s control, the Agency shall consult with the municipality or other local sponsor to attempt to reach an agreement to determine the scope of the municipality’s or other local sponsor’s repayment obligation.

Within 15 days of an Agency determination under subsection (a) of this section, a municipality may petition the Board for a hearing to determine if cancellation of the project was due to circumstances or events in whole or in part outside the municipality’s control. The Board shall hold a hearing on the petition within 30 days of its receipt and shall issue an appropriate order within 30 days thereafter. If the Board determines that cancellation of the project was due in whole or in part to circumstances or events outside the municipality’s control, it shall order that the municipality’s repayment obligation be reduced proportionally, in whole or in part. The municipality shall have no obligation to make a repayment under this section until the Board issues its order.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 30.

§ 309d.
Policy for municipally managed transportation projects.

Except in the case of projects or project components involving unpaved highways, for all transportation projects and project phases managed by a municipality, including planning, development, construction, or maintenance, it is the policy of this State for municipalities to consider “complete streets” principles, which are principles of safety and accommodation of all transportation system users, regardless of age, ability, or modal preference. If, after the consideration required under this section, a project does not incorporate complete streets principles, the municipality managing the project shall make a written determination, supported by documentation and available for public inspection at the office of the municipal clerk and at the Agency of Transportation, that one or more of the following circumstances exist:

Use of the transportation facility by pedestrians, bicyclists, or other users is prohibited by law.

The cost of incorporating complete streets principles is disproportionate to the need or probable use as determined by factors such as land use, current and projected user volumes, population density, crash data, historic and natural resource constraints, and maintenance requirements. The municipality shall consult local and regional plans, as appropriate, in assessing these and any other relevant factors.

Incorporating complete streets principles is outside the scope of a project because of its very nature.

The written determination required by subsection (a) of this section shall be final and shall not be subject to appeal or further review.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 34

, § 3.

§ 310.
Highways, bridges, and trails.

A town shall keep its class 1, 2, and 3 highways and bridges in good and sufficient repair during all seasons of the year, except that based on safety considerations for the traveling public and municipal employees, the selectboard shall, by rule adopted under 24 V.S.A. chapter 59, and after following the process for providing notice and hearing in section 709 of this title, have authority to determine whether a class 2 or 3 highway, or section of highway, should be plowed and made negotiable during the winter. A property owner aggrieved by a decision of the selectboard may appeal to the Transportation Board pursuant to subdivision 5(d)(9) of this title.

Class 4 highways may be maintained to the extent required by the necessity of the town, the public good and the convenience of the inhabitants of the town, or may be reclassified using the same procedures as for laying out highways and meeting the standards set forth in section 302 of this title.

A town shall not be liable for construction, maintenance, repair, or safety of trails.

For class 2 and 3 highways that have routinely not been plowed and made negotiable prior to July 1, 2000, the process requirements of subdivision 302(a)(3)(B) of this title and subsection (a) of this section shall not be required. A property owner adversely affected by this subsection may request the selectboard to plow and make negotiable a class 2 or 3 town highway. However, a property owner aggrieved by a decision of the selectboard may appeal to the Transportation Board pursuant to subdivision 5(d)(9) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1999, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 29, 30, eff. May 29, 2000.

§ 311.
Class 1 and 2 highways; pavement markings.

The Agency shall mark all paved class 1 and 2 highways with painted center lines. The selectboard promptly shall notify the district transportation administrator when these markings have been obliterated by resurfacing.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. July 1, 1993;

1993, No. 25

, § 61a, eff. May 18, 1993;

1995, No. 60

, § 22, eff. April 25, 1995.

§ 312.
Use of funds; unexpended balances.

The funds raised from town highway taxes shall not be used for any purpose other than that for which the tax was voted, subject to the provisions of this chapter.
If in any year money so voted is not expended, it shall be applied for the same purpose the following year.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 313.
Restricting use of covered bridges.

The Agency and the selectmen of the town where a covered bridge is located or, if parts of such a bridge are located in more than one town, the selectmen of the towns acting jointly, may restrict the use of the bridge to vehicles that are within limits as to weight, height, and width as they shall establish.
The limitation shall be plainly posted at the approaches to the bridge at approximately 100 feet from each end of the bridge, and at intersections as may be required to enable operators of restricted vehicles to proceed by the most direct alternate unrestricted route.
Posting shall be by means of permanent signs of a standard size of at least 24 inches by 24 inches, and with lettering not less than three inches high.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 314.
Vote at town meeting.

In case the limitations proposed for a covered bridge are not approved by the selectmen and the Agency as provided in this chapter, the selectmen of the town or towns where the bridge is located shall have the right to place the question in the warnings of the next annual or special town meeting.
When the bridge is located in more than one town, the limitations must be adopted by each of the towns and when so adopted, the bridge shall be posted according to the limitations.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 315.
Penalties.

A person who operates a vehicle exceeding the limit prescribed on a bridge thus restricted shall be fined not more than $200.00 for the first offense and not more than $300.00 for each subsequent offense.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 316.
Removal of covered bridges; notice.

When a town or the Agency decide that the destruction or removal of a covered bridge is necessary, whether by discontinuance of the highway or to replace the bridge with another structure or for any other reason, notice of the intent to destroy or remove the bridge shall be posted by the officials in three public places in the town where the bridge is located and published on two consecutive days in a newspaper of general circulation in the town.
Copies of the notice shall be sent by certified mail to the Governor and the Director of the Division for Historic Preservation not less than 90 days before destruction or removal is to be started, and the date of the proposed destruction or removal shall be stated in the notice.
The requirement for a 90-day warning shall not apply in the event of a serious emergency.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 317.
Preservation of historic bridges.

The Division for Historic Preservation within the Agency of Commerce and Community Development is authorized to accept transfer from the Agency of Transportation, towns, railroads, or other entities of bridges deemed appropriate for preservation by the Secretary of Transportation and the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development. The Division also is authorized to accept land or interests in land with each such bridge as reasonably necessary to preserve the bridge site and public access to the site.

Transfer of any bridge site or bridge approach to the Division for Historic Preservation under this section shall not be treated, for purposes of any law or rule of law, as an abandonment of the use of the right-of-way for highway or railroad purposes.

The Division for Historic Preservation may adopt such rules as are necessary to preserve, protect, and control the use of historic bridges, bridge sites, and bridge approaches.

The Division for Historic Preservation is authorized to purchase or lease a site or sites for the storage of dismantled historic bridges that are being preserved for possible reconstruction and reuse.

The Division for Historic Preservation is authorized to sell, lease, or otherwise convey the fee or lesser interest to any historic bridge. In all cases where an historic bridge is conveyed, the Division shall prescribe covenants necessary to preserve the historic integrity of the bridge. Any funds obtained from the sale, lease, or conveyance shall be used for the purposes outlined in subsection (a) of this section.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 36

, § 3; amended

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a), (b);

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.

§ 318.
Local Technical Assistance Program; input from municipalities.

Prior to submitting a fiscal year Local Technical Assistance Program (LTAP) work plan to the Federal Highway Administration for approval, the Agency shall, in consultation with the Vermont League of Cities and Towns and any other person the Agency deems appropriate, solicit from all Vermont towns, villages, and cities:

input on whether the Agency is providing effective municipal transportation-related technical assistance and training through the LTAP;

recommendations on how to improve the Agency’s operation of the LTAP; and

recommendations for new training, technical assistance, or support functions to be provided through the LTAP.

The Agency shall consider the input and recommendations received from municipalities in developing its annual LTAP work plan.

Upon request, the Agency shall provide the Vermont League of Cities and Towns administrative support in soliciting and collecting municipal input and recommendations.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.